Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2248.01
Violations of act; action by Attorney General.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of the Real Property Appraiser Act, the Attorney General may maintain an action in the name of the State of Nebraska, in the district court of the county in which such violation or threatened violation occurred, to abate and temporarily and permanently enjoin such acts and practices and to enforce compliance with the act. The plaintiff shall not be required to give any bond nor shall any court costs be adjudged against the plaintiff.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 68.